Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4727
Commission; employees.

The commission may employ any employees, including interpreters, it considers necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 71-4720 to 71-4732.01.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 25, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 359, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 334, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 15.